Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7701
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-7701 to 44-7712 shall be known and may be cited as the Model Act Regarding Use of Credit Information in Personal Insurance.

Laws 2003, LB 487, § 1.